DI-836

DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DI3MJ-02

CIRCUIT INSPECTION
DTC B1213 /13 Tilt and telescopic ECU communica-
tion stop
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between tilt and telescopic ECU and Body ECU.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
No communication from tilt and telescopic ECU more than 10 | «Tilt and telescopic ECU
B1213/13 .
seconds. * Wireharness
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check tilt and telescopic ECU.

CHECK:

Check the operation of the manual tilt and telescopic.

HINT:

With this inspection, the tile and telescopic ECU CPU can be diagnosed if it works normally or not.

NG> Replace the tilt and telescopic ECU.
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2 Check wireharness

Tilt & telescopic ECU

Mirror ECU  Tilt & telescopic ECU

=) MPX2(8)

108502

PREPARATION:

Disconnect connector body ECU, tilt and telescopic ECU and

Power mirror ECU.

CHECK:

(@ Check continuity between terminals MPX1 of body ECU
and MPX1 of tilt and telescopic ECU.

(b)  Check continuity between terminals MPX2 of tilt and tele-
scopic ECU and MPX2 of Power mirror ECU.

OK:

There is a continuity in wireharness.

NG> Repair or replace wireharness.

Replace the tilt and telescopic ECU.
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